Nevada, session 2025Special36, SB6.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act,
being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3538, is hereby
amended by adding thereto a new section to be designated as section
9.5, immediately following section 9.3, to read as follows:
Sec. 9.5. The Housing Division shall report, at least
quarterly, to the Interim Finance Committee information
concerning the status of the program undertaken pursuant
to sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, of the Windsor Park
Environmental Justice Act.
Sec. 2. Section 8 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice
Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3540, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 8. “Windsor Park neighborhood” means the area of
the City lying north of West Cartier Avenue, west of Clayton
Street, east of Chamberlain Lane, and south of West Evans
Avenue. The area includes single-family residences and
vacant lots on the south side of West Cartier Avenue and
otherwise within the area defined in this section. The area
also includes single-family residences and vacant lots west
of Chamberlain Lane and on West Cartier Avenue, Sommer
Court, Hayworth Avenue or Stanton Drive.
Sec. 3. Section 9 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice
Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3540, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 9. 1. The Housing Division shall establish and
administer a program pursuant to which the owner of [a] :
(a) A single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood who owns that residence on [July 1, 2023,]
August 1, 2025, may exchange that single-family residence
for another single-family residence constructed in accordance
with this section.
(b) A vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood who
owned a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood that was formerly located on that vacant lot,
or the descendant of such an owner, and who owns that
vacant lot on August 1, 2025, may exchange that vacant lot
for another vacant lot in an area as near as reasonably
practicable to the Windsor Park neighborhood in
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 4 –
accordance with this section. The owner or descendant of
such an owner must be offered the opportunity to exchange
a vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood for a vacant
lot that is located in the Cibola Park area of the City and
that is available to be exchanged in accordance with any
agreements between the City, Clark County and the
Housing Division, before being offered any other vacant lot.
2. For the purposes of the program established
pursuant to this section, a person may establish that he or
she is the owner of a single-family residence or a vacant lot
in the Windsor Park neighborhood on August 1, 2025, by:
(a) Executing an affidavit, under penalty of perjury, that
he or she acquired title to the single-family residence or
vacant lot from a deceased relative by operation of law; and
(b) Presenting to the Housing Division, or the
governmental agency, nonprofit corporation or other entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to subsection 3,
any of the following evidence of ownership:
(1) An original deed, deed of trust, bill of sale or land
installment contract;
(2) A current property tax bill and proof of payment
of property taxes for the immediately preceding 15 years;
(3) A certified copy of a will naming the applicant as
heir to the property along with a death certificate;
(4) Any evidence that the applicant is the heir to the
property, including, without limitation, proof that the
applicant has lived in the single-family residence since
childhood, a family tree or a history of property tax
payments;
(5) Any evidence that the applicant has had physical
occupation of the single-family residence or has acted as
owner of the single-family residence for the immediately
preceding 15 years, including, without limitation, a history
of property tax payments or a history of the payment of
utility bills; or
(6) Any other documentation to establish ownership
or inheritance of the single-family residence, including,
without limitation, notarized documentation or letters from
family members.
[2.] 3. The Housing Division shall apply for any
available grants of money from the Federal Government to
carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, of this
act and shall select a governmental agency, nonprofit
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 5 –
corporation or other entity engaged in the development of
affordable housing to develop single-family residences on
vacant land [adjacent] in areas as near as reasonably
practicable to the Windsor Park neighborhood. The
governmental agency, nonprofit corporation or other entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to this subsection
shall, in accordance with a financing agreement entered into
pursuant to subsection [5,] 6, contract with qualified
professionals for a study of vacant land adjacent to the
Windsor Park neighborhood that could be acquired to ensure
that such land will not subside, acquire vacant land adjacent
to the Windsor Park neighborhood if the study finds that such
land will not subside and enter into contracts to develop and
construct single-family residences on that land. In awarding
such contracts, a preference with a relative weight of 5
percent must be assigned to an applicant that is a business in
which at least 50 percent of the interest is owned by a resident
or former resident of the Windsor Park neighborhood. Any
restriction on the price which the Housing Division may pay
to acquire a parcel of real property does not apply to an
acquisition pursuant to this section.
[3.] 4. The number of single-family residences
constructed pursuant to this section must be [sufficient in
number to enable each household residing in a single-family
residence in] determined based on a list of residents of the
Windsor Park neighborhood [on July 1, 2023, to obtain such]
who are eligible to exchange that residence for a single-
family residence [, and the] constructed pursuant to this
section, as verified by the Housing Division. The single-
family residences constructed pursuant to this section must
enable [a household residing in] an owner of a single-family
residence in the Windsor Park neighborhood on [July 1,
2023,] August 1, 2025, to obtain a single-family residence
with at least the same amount of square footage as the
residence in the Windsor Park neighborhood. The number of
vacant lots acquired pursuant to this section must be
sufficient in number and size to enable each owner
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of a vacant lot in
the Windsor Park neighborhood who owned a vacant lot in
the Windsor Park neighborhood on August 1 2025, to
exchange the vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood
for a vacant lot with at least the same number of acres as
the vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 6 –
[4.] 5. The City shall grant the employees and
representatives of the governmental entity, nonprofit
corporation or other entity selected by the Housing Division,
and the Housing Division, access to any right-of-way owned
or controlled by the City and access to any lots owned by the
City within the Windsor Park neighborhood when such access
is necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, and the
City shall not unreasonably withhold such access.
[5.] 6. The governmental entity, nonprofit corporation
or other entity selected by the Housing Division pursuant to
subsection [2,] 3, the City and the Housing Division shall
enter into an agreement to finance the development and
construction of single-family residences pursuant to this
section. The agreement must require:
(a) The use of money appropriated or authorized by the
Legislature to the Housing Division for the purposes set forth
in this section.
(b) Any other money from any public or private source,
including, without limitation, any gift, grant, appropriation or
contribution, available to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section.
[6.] 7. For the purpose of constructing, financing and
conveying property pursuant to this section, the entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to subsection 3
may own and hold title to, in the name of the entity, any
property acquired to carry out the provisions of this section.
The entity selected by the Housing Division pursuant to
subsection 3 shall not use the property acquired pursuant to
this section for any purpose other than the purposes set
forth in this section.
8. Upon the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for
each single-family residence constructed pursuant to this
section, the owner of a single-family residence in the Windsor
Park neighborhood who owns that residence on [July 1,
2023,] August 1, 2025, may exchange that single-family
residence for a single-family residence which was constructed
pursuant to this section and which has at least the same
amount of square footage as the residence being exchanged.
If the single-family residence being exchanged is:
(a) Encumbered by a mortgage or deed of trust, the
single-family residence may not be exchanged unless the
existing mortgage or deed of trust is paid in full [. The] or
transferred to the new single-family residence. To the extent
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 7 –
necessary to facilitate an exchange of a single-family
residence pursuant to this section, the Housing Division
shall provide assistance to arrange any financing necessary to
pay off the existing mortgage or deed of trust, including,
without limitation, any down payment assistance available
under any program administered by the Housing Division.
The amount of the existing mortgage or deed of trust paid
off through any assistance provided by the Housing
Division pursuant to this paragraph must not exceed the
payoff amount as of May 25, 2025, and any amount
necessary to cure interest, fees or arrearages incurred after
May 25, 2025.
(b) Encumbered by any other lien that would prevent the
exchange of the single-family residence, the Housing
Division may provide assistance in arranging financing to
pay off any such lien or may provide such financial
assistance as is necessary to facilitate the exchange of a
single-family residence pursuant to this section.
(c) Leased to a tenant occupying the single-family
residence under a lease agreement, the lease agreement
remains in effect with the same terms and conditions.
[ Any]
9. The Housing Division may require any transaction
for the exchange of a single-family residence or vacant lot
pursuant to subsection 8 to be closed through an escrow
process, with an American Land Title Association owner’s
policy of title insurance showing only permitted
encumbrances and the lien required to be recorded
pursuant to subsection 10. Any recording fees, any fees to
prepare or file documents and any other fees or charges
necessary to complete a transaction for the exchange of a
single-family residence or vacant lot for a single-family
residence which was constructed pursuant to this section
must be paid by the Housing Division from money
appropriated to the Housing Division for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of the Windsor Park
Environmental Justice Act.
10. The Housing Division shall file for record in the
office of the county recorder a lien on each single-family
residence and vacant lot acquired by an owner of a single-
family residence or vacant lot in the Windsor Park
neighborhood in an exchange conducted pursuant to this
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 8 –
[subsection may not be sold for a period of] section to secure
repayment to the Housing Division of an amount equal:
(a) The value of the single-family residence or vacant lot
at the time it was acquired;
(b) Any fees or charges paid by the Housing Division
pursuant to subsection 9 with respect to the single-family
residence or vacant lot;
(c) Any relocation expenses paid pursuant to section 9.3
of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act, as
amended by section 4 of this act; and
(d) Any amount of a mortgage or deed of trust, or any
other lien, paid off pursuant to subsection 8,
 if the single-family residence or vacant lot is sold or
transferred, except for a transfer that is exempt pursuant to
NRS 375.090 from the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
375 of NRS, at any time within 5 years after the date of the
recording of the lien.
11. The amount of any repayment due pursuant to
subsection 10 must not exceed the net proceeds of the sale
or transfer, after payment of all superior liens and
reasonable closing costs. The lien filed pursuant to
subsection 10 must state the amount secured by the lien. A
lien under this subsection is prior to all other liens and
encumbrances on the unit except liens for taxes and other
governmental assessments, charges or liens against the
single-family residence and any first mortgage or deed of
trust on the single-family residence acquired pursuant to
this section. The lien filed pursuant to subsection 10 expires
5 years after the [single-family residence is acquired, except
that such a single-family residence may be transferred in a
transaction that is exempt from the taxes imposed by chapter
375 of NRS pursuant to NRS 375.090.
7.] filing of the certificate except for any portion of the
lien securing any debt paid off or transferred to facilitate an
exchange of a single-family residence pursuant to this
section. Any amount paid to the Housing Division pursuant
to this subsection must be deposited with the State Treasurer
for credit to the State General Fund.
12. Until July 1, 2057, a single-family residence
acquired pursuant to subsection 7 is entitled to an
exemption from property taxes that is equal to the difference
between the taxes levied on the single-family residence that
was acquired pursuant to subsection 7, as determined
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 9 –
pursuant to NRS 361.225 and 361.227, on the date on which
that single-family residence was acquired, and the taxes
levied on the single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood that was exchanged, as determined pursuant
to NRS 361.225 and 361.227, for the fiscal year in which
the single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood was exchanged. The provisions of NRS
361.4722, 361.4723 and 361.4724 apply to the calculation of
the taxes on the single-family residence levied on the single-
family residence acquired pursuant to subsection 7.
13. The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 375 of NRS
do not apply to any transfer of property pursuant to the
provisions of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act
by the governmental agency, nonprofit corporation or other
entity that has entered into an agreement pursuant to
subsection 6, or an affiliate of such an entity, or a transfer
of property pursuant to the provisions of this Act to or from
a resident of the Windsor Park neighborhood, or the owner
of a vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood, who is
exchanging a single-family residence or a vacant lot
pursuant to the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act.
14. The power, sewer and other connection fees imposed
by the City on a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood must be transferred to a single-family residence
acquired pursuant to this section as the power, sewer and the
connections fees to be imposed on that single-family
residence.
[8.] 15. It is the intent of the Legislature that because
of the conditions existing in the Windsor Park
neighborhood, as described in section 2 of the Windsor
Park Environmental Justice Act, and because it is the intent
of the Legislature that the single-family residences and
vacant lots in the Windsor Park neighborhood that are
exchanged pursuant to this section be demolished and
replaced by a park pursuant to subsection 16, an owner of a
single-family residence or vacant lot in the Windsor Park
neighborhood who is voluntarily exchanging the single-
family residence or vacant lot for a new single-family
residence or vacant lot under the provisions of this section
is making such an exchange because of the destruction, in
whole or in part, of the single-family residence or vacant lot
as a result of the conditions described in section 2 of the
Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act or under threat of
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 10 –
the requisition or condemnation of the property for the
purposes of 26 U.S.C. § 1033.
16. Any property in the Windsor Park neighborhood that
is exchanged pursuant to this section must be used only for
the purposes of a public park to memorialize the past and
present residents of the Windsor Park neighborhood [.] ,
which must be available for use, without charge, to schools
and churches that serve the Windsor Park neighborhood.
For the purposes of creating the public park, the entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to subsection 3 to
develop single-family residences must be engaged under an
agreement with the Housing Division, which may act as
custodian of the land on which the park is to be constructed
and may consult with entities that applied for or received
any grants of money to construct City View Park in the
Windsor Park neighborhood. The agreement must be
separate from any agreement entered into pursuant to
subsection 6, for any additional work necessary to develop
and construct the public park, including, without limitation,
the demolition of any residences transferred pursuant to
this section and, if necessary to construct a park pursuant to
this subsection, the acquisition of any parcel of land owned
by a private party on which a residence is located that has
not been transferred pursuant to this section. Any
agreement for the demolition of the residences pursuant to
this subsection is exempt from the provisions of state law
governing the award of a contract by governmental entities,
and any payments pursuant to such an agreement,
including, without limitation, any payments to acquire any
parcel of land owned by a private party on which a
residence is located that has not been transferred pursuant
to this section, must be paid entirely from money
appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose. The
agreement may authorize the retention or reuse of existing
public or private infrastructure and materials used in
connection with such infrastructure, including, without
limitation, streets, sidewalks, lighting, water meters, curbs
and foundations, if such retention or reuse is safe and cost-
effective. After the demolition of the residences pursuant to
this subsection, the City shall maintain the property as a
public park for the purposes described in this subsection.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 11 –
Sec. 4. Section 9.3 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice
Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3542, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 9.3. 1. The Housing Division shall establish a
program to pay:
(a) The [moving] relocation expenses of [and restitution
to] the owners of single-family residences in the Windsor
Park neighborhood [in the manner set forth in this section.]
who acquire a single-family residence pursuant to section 9
of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act and who
move from the Windsor Park neighborhood to the acquired
single-family residence, and to any tenant of an owner of a
single-family residence who is required to move because the
owner acquires a single-family residence pursuant to
section 9 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act.
(b) The cost of the rehabilitation of the homes constructed
[with money received by the City from Community
Development Block Grants for the purpose of rehabilitating
homes in the Windsor Park neighborhood.] in the Cibola
Park neighborhood to replace homes in the Windsor Park
neighborhood, in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per
single-family residence.
2. The City shall transfer to the Housing Division:
(a) Any remaining proceeds of general obligation bonds
issued by the City and purchased by the Federal National
Mortgage Association for the purpose of relocating residents
of the Windsor Park neighborhood [.] , and any remaining
interest on those proceeds.
(b) Any money remaining from Community Development
Block Grants awarded to the City for the purpose of
relocating residents in the Windsor Park neighborhood.
(c) Any money remaining from Community Development
Block Grants awarded to the City for the purpose of
constructing residences for the residents of the Windsor Park
neighborhood.
 [Any] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
money received pursuant to this subsection must be
accounted for separately and may be used only to carry out
the provisions of this section. Any use of money received
from a Community Development Block Grant may be used
for any purpose authorized by the provisions of the Windsor
Park Environmental Justice Act, but must be used only for
such purposes for which Community Development Block
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 12 –
Grants may be used under federal law governing
Community Development Block Grants.
3. From amounts [transferred] available to the Housing
Division [pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 2,]
to carry out the provisions of the Windsor Park
Environmental Justice Act, the Housing Division shall [:
(a) Pay restitution in the amount of $50,000 to the owner
of a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood who resides in the neighborhood on July 1,
2023, and who was the initial occupant of that single-family
residence, or to the descendants of that owner who inherited
the single-family residence from the initial occupant and who
reside in the single-family residence on July 1, 2023.
(b) Pay restitution in the amount of $10,000 to the person
who was the initial occupant of a single-family residence in
the Windsor Park neighborhood, or to the descendants of that
person who inherited the single-family residence from the
initial occupant.
(c) Pay] pay the actual [moving] relocation expenses in
an amount not to exceed $50,000 of a person who owns a
single-family residence in the Windsor Park neighborhood
on August 1, 2025, who acquires a single-family residence
pursuant to section 9 of [this act] the Windsor Park
Environmental Justice Act and who moves from the
Windsor Park neighborhood to that acquired single-family
residence.
[4. From the amount transferred to the Housing Division
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the Housing
Division shall pay, in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per
single-family residence, the cost of rehabilitating a single-
family residence constructed for a resident of the Windsor
Park neighborhood using money received by the City from a
Community Development Block Grant. The governmental
entity, nonprofit corporation or other entity selected by the
Housing Division pursuant to subsection 2 of section 9 of this
act shall inspect the single-family residence to determine
whether or not the rehabilitation has been satisfactorily
completed.
5.] Such relocation expenses may be paid to a person
who was the tenant of an owner of a single-family residence
in the Windsor Park neighborhood on August 1, 2025, and
who is required to move residences as a result of the
program established pursuant to section 9 of this act.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 13 –
Subject to such safeguards as the Housing Division deems
appropriate to ensure that the objective of the payment is
accomplished, relocation expenses may be paid in advance
directly to the owner or tenant incurring the expenses or to
the vendor, based on documentation, including, without
limitation, quotes, establishing the actual amount of the
expenses. To the extent that money [transferred] available to
the Housing Division [pursuant to subsection 2 is] to carry
out the provisions of the Windsor Park Environmental
Justice Act is insufficient to make the entire amount of the
payments required by this subsection, [3 or 4,] the Housing
Division shall reduce such payments on a pro rata basis.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
the purposes of this section, relocation expenses may
include, without limitation, packing, movers, insurance,
storage up to 90 days, utility deposits and transfers,
reconnection fees, household appliances not included in the
development, furniture replacement, fixtures, solar panel
reinstallation, temporary lodging up to 30 days and
transportation for tenant households only. Any expenses for
which federal law governing the use of money from a
Community Development Block Grant prohibits payment as
relocation expenses must not be considered relocation
expenses for the purposes of this section.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry the sum of $25,000,000 for the purposes set
forth in the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act, being chapter
531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3538, and the provisions of
sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2028, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 15, 2028, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 15, 2028.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)